Mississippi, session 2026, HB145.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 27-65-17, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-65-17.  (1)  (a)  Except as otherwise provided in this section, upon every person engaging or continuing within this state in the business of selling any tangible personal property whatsoever there is hereby levied, assessed and shall be collected a tax equal to seven percent (7%) of the gross proceeds of the retail sales of the business. (b)  Retail sales of farm tractors and parts and labor used to maintain and/or repair such tractors shall be taxed at the rate of one and one-half percent (1-1/2%) when made to farmers for agricultural purposes. (c)  (i)  Retail sales of farm implements sold to farmers and used directly in the production of poultry, ratite, domesticated fish as defined in Section 69-7-501, livestock, livestock products, agricultural crops or ornamental plant crops or used for other agricultural purposes, and parts and labor used to maintain and/or repair such implements, shall be taxed at the rate of one and one-half percent (1-1/2%) when used on the farm. (ii)  The one and one-half percent (1-1/2%) rate shall also apply to all equipment used in logging, pulpwood operations or tree farming, and parts and labor used to maintain and/or repair such equipment, which is either: 1.  Self-propelled, or 2.  Mounted so that it is permanently attached to other equipment which is self-propelled or attached to other equipment drawn by a vehicle which is self-propelled. In order to be eligible for the rate of tax provided for in this subparagraph (ii), such sales must be made to a professional logger.  For the purposes of this subparagraph (ii), a "professional logger" is a person, corporation, limited liability company or other entity, or an agent thereof, who possesses a professional logger's permit issued by the Department of Revenue and who presents the permit to the seller at the time of purchase.  The department shall establish an application process for a professional logger's permit to be issued, which shall include a requirement that the applicant submit a copy of documentation verifying that the applicant is certified according to Sustainable Forestry Initiative guidelines.  Upon a determination that an applicant is a professional logger, the department shall issue the applicant a numbered professional logger's permit. (d)  Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section, retail sales of aircraft, automobiles, trucks, truck-tractors, semitrailers and manufactured or mobile homes shall be taxed at the rate of three percent (3%). (e)  Sales of manufacturing machinery or manufacturing machine parts when made to a manufacturer or custom processor for plant use only when the machinery and machine parts will be used exclusively and directly within this state in manufacturing a commodity for sale, rental or in processing for a fee shall be taxed at the rate of one and one-half percent (1-1/2%). (f)  Sales of machinery and machine parts when made to a technology intensive enterprise for plant use only when the machinery and machine parts will be used exclusively and directly within this state for industrial purposes, including, but not limited to, manufacturing or research and development activities, shall be taxed at the rate of one and one-half percent (1-1/2%).  In order to be considered a technology intensive enterprise for purposes of this paragraph: (i)  The enterprise shall meet minimum criteria established by the Mississippi Development Authority; (ii)  The enterprise shall employ at least ten (10) persons in full-time jobs; (iii)  At least ten percent (10%) of the workforce in the facility operated by the enterprise shall be scientists, engineers or computer specialists; (iv)  The enterprise shall manufacture plastics, chemicals, automobiles, aircraft, computers or electronics; or shall be a research and development facility, a computer design or related facility, or a software publishing facility or other technology intensive facility or enterprise as determined by the Mississippi Development Authority; (v)  The average wage of all workers employed by the enterprise at the facility shall be at least one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the state average annual wage; and (vi)  The enterprise must provide a basic health care plan to all employees at the facility. A medical cannabis establishment, as defined in the Mississippi Medical Cannabis Act, shall not be considered to be a technology intensive enterprise for the purposes of this paragraph (f). (g)  Sales of materials for use in track and track structures to a railroad whose rates are fixed by the Interstate Commerce Commission or the Mississippi Public Service Commission shall be taxed at the rate of three percent (3%). (h)  Sales of tangible personal property to electric power associations for use in the ordinary and necessary operation of their generating or distribution systems shall be taxed at the rate of one percent (1%). (i)  Wholesale sales of food and drink for human consumption to full-service vending machine operators to be sold through vending machines located apart from and not connected with other taxable businesses shall be taxed at the rate of eight percent (8%). (j)  Sales of equipment used or designed for the purpose of assisting disabled persons, such as wheelchair equipment and lifts, that is mounted or attached to or installed on a private carrier of passengers or light carrier of property, as defined in Section 27-51-101, at the time when the private carrier of passengers or light carrier of property is sold shall be taxed at the same rate as the sale of such vehicles under this section. (k)  Sales of the factory-built components of modular homes, panelized homes and precut homes, and panel constructed homes consisting of structural insulated panels, shall be taxed at the rate of three percent (3%). (l)  Sales of materials used in the repair, renovation, addition to, expansion and/or improvement of buildings and related facilities used by a dairy producer shall be taxed at the rate of three and one-half percent (3-1/2%).  For the purposes of this paragraph (l), "dairy producer" means any person engaged in the production of milk for commercial use. (m)  Sales of equipment and materials used in connection with geophysical surveying, exploring, developing, drilling, redrilling, completing, working over, producing, distributing, or testing of oil, gas and other mineral resources shall be taxed at the rate of four and one-half percent (4-1/2%).  Operators that rebill sales of equipment and materials to nonoperating working interest owners on behalf of a joint account through the joint interest billing (JIB), where the sales tax has been paid or accrued by the operator shall not be charged a sales tax on the JIB as services income. (n)  Retail sales of food or drink for human consumption not purchased with food stamps issued by the United States Department of Agriculture or other federal agency, but which would be exempt under Section 27-65-111(o) from the taxes imposed by this chapter if the food items were purchased with food stamps, shall be taxed at the rate of five percent (5%) from and after July 1, 2025. (o)  From and after July 1, 2026, sales of firearms, ammunition, archery equipment, motorcycles, all-terrain vehicles and jet skis shall be taxed at the rate of eight percent (8%). (2)  From and after January 1, 1995, retail sales of private carriers of passengers and light carriers of property, as defined in Section 27-51-101, shall be taxed an additional two percent (2%). (3)  A manufacturer selling at retail in this state shall be required to make returns of the gross proceeds of such sales and pay the tax imposed in this section. SECTION 2.  Section 27-65-25, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-65-25.  Upon every person engaging or continuing within this state in the business of selling alcoholic beverages at retail, the sales of which are legal under the provisions of Chapter 1 of Title 67, Mississippi Code of 1972, there is hereby levied, assessed and shall be collected a tax equal to * * *seven percent (7%) eight percent (8%) of the gross proceeds of the retail sales of the business. SECTION 3.  Section 27-65-75, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-65-75.  On or before the fifteenth day of each month, the revenue collected under the provisions of this chapter during the preceding month shall be paid and distributed as follows: (1)  (a)  On or before August 15, 1992, and each succeeding month thereafter through July 15, 1993, eighteen percent (18%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter, except that collected under the provisions of Sections 27-65-15, 27-65-19(3) and 27-65-21, on business activities within a municipal corporation shall be allocated for distribution to the municipality and paid to the municipal corporation.  Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph (a), on or before August 15, 1993, and each succeeding month thereafter through August 15, 2025, eighteen and one-half percent (18-1/2%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter, except that collected under the provisions of Sections 27-65-15, 27-65-19(3), 27-65-21 and 27-65-24, on business activities within a municipal corporation shall be allocated for distribution to the municipality and paid to the municipal corporation.  Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph (a), on or before September 15, 2025, and each succeeding month thereafter, eighteen and one-half percent (18.5%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under this chapter, except that collected under Sections 27-65-15, 27-65-17(1)(n), 27-65-19(3), 27-65-21 and 27-65-24, on business activities within a municipal corporation shall be allocated for distribution and paid to the municipal corporation.  On or before September 15, 2025, and each succeeding month thereafter, twenty-five and nine-tenths percent (25.9%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under Section 27-65-17(1)(n) on business activities within a municipal corporation shall be allocated for distribution and paid to the municipal corporation.  However, in the event the State Auditor issues a certificate of noncompliance pursuant to Section 21-35-31, the department shall withhold ten percent (10%) of the allocations and payments to the municipality that would otherwise be payable to the municipality under this paragraph (a) until such time that the department receives written notice of the cancellation of a certificate of noncompliance from the State Auditor. A municipal corporation, for the purpose of distributing the tax under this subsection, shall mean and include all incorporated cities, towns and villages. Monies allocated for distribution and credited to a municipal corporation under this paragraph may be pledged as security for a loan if the distribution received by the municipal corporation is otherwise authorized or required by law to be pledged as security for such a loan. In any county having a county seat that is not an incorporated municipality, the distribution provided under this subsection shall be made as though the county seat was an incorporated municipality; however, the distribution to the municipality shall be paid to the county treasury in which the municipality is located, and those funds shall be used for road, bridge and street construction or maintenance in the county. (b)  On or before August 15, 2006, and each succeeding month thereafter through August 15, 2025, eighteen and one-half percent (18-1/2%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter, except that collected under the provisions of Sections 27-65-15, 27-65-19(3) and 27-65-21, on business activities on the campus of a state institution of higher learning or community or junior college whose campus is not located within the corporate limits of a municipality, shall be allocated for distribution to the state institution of higher learning or community or junior college and paid to the state institution of higher learning or community or junior college.  On or before September 15, 2025, and each succeeding month thereafter, eighteen and one-half percent (18.5%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under this chapter, except that collected under Sections 27-65-15, 27-65-17(1)(n), 27-65-19(3) and 27-65-21, on business activities on the campus of a state institution of higher learning or community or junior college whose campus is not located within the corporate limits of a municipality, shall be allocated for distribution and paid to the state institution of higher learning or community or junior college.  On or before September 15, 2025, and each succeeding month thereafter, twenty-five and nine-tenths percent (25.9%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under Section 27-65-17(1)(n) on business activities on the campus of a state institution of higher learning or community or junior college whose campus is not located within the corporate limits of a municipality, shall be allocated for distribution and paid to the state institution of higher learning or community or junior college. (c)  On or before August 15, 2018, and each succeeding month thereafter until August 14, 2019, two percent (2%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter, except that collected under the provisions of Sections 27-65-15, 27-65-19(3), 27-65-21 and 27-65-24, on business activities within the corporate limits of the City of Jackson, Mississippi, shall be deposited into the Capitol Complex Improvement District Project Fund created in Section 29-5-215.  On or before August 15, 2019, and each succeeding month thereafter until August 14, 2020, four percent (4%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter, except that collected under the provisions of Sections 27-65-15, 27-65-19(3), 27-65-21 and 27-65-24, on business activities within the corporate limits of the City of Jackson, Mississippi, shall be deposited into the Capitol Complex Improvement District Project Fund created in Section 29-5-215.  On or before August 15, 2020, and each succeeding month thereafter through July 15, 2023, six percent (6%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter, except that collected under the provisions of Sections 27-65-15, 27-65-19(3), 27-65-21 and 27-65-24, on business activities within the corporate limits of the City of Jackson, Mississippi, shall be deposited into the Capitol Complex Improvement District Project Fund created in Section 29-5-215.  On or before August 15, 2023, and each succeeding month thereafter through August 15, 2025, nine percent (9%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter, except that collected under the provisions of Sections 27-65-15, 27-65-19(3), 27-65-21 and 27-65-24, on business activities within the corporate limits of the City of Jackson, Mississippi, shall be deposited into the Capitol Complex Improvement District Project Fund created in Section 29-5-215.  On or before September 15, 2025, and each succeeding month thereafter, nine percent (9%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under this chapter, except that collected under Sections 27-65-15, 27-65-17(1)(n), 27-65-19(3), 27-65-21 and 27-65-24, on business activities within the corporate limits of the City of Jackson, Mississippi, shall be deposited into the Capitol Complex Improvement District Project Fund created in Section 27-5-215.  On or before September 15, 2025, and each succeeding month thereafter, twelve and six-tenths percent (12.6%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under Section 27-65-17(1)(n) on business activities within the corporate limits of the City of Jackson, Mississippi, shall be deposited into the Capitol Complex Improvement District Project Fund created in Section 27-5-215. (d)  (i)  Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph (d), on or before the fifteenth day of the month that the diversion authorized by this section begins, and each succeeding month thereafter, eighteen and one-half percent (18-1/2%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter, except that collected under the provisions of Sections 27-65-15, 27-65-19(3) and 27-65-21, on business activities within a redevelopment project area developed under a redevelopment plan adopted under the Tax Increment Financing Act (Section 21-45-1 et seq.) shall be allocated for distribution to the county in which the project area is located if: 1.  The county: a. Borders on the Mississippi Sound and the State of Alabama, or b.  Is Harrison County, Mississippi, and the project area is within a radius of two (2) miles from the intersection of Interstate 10 and Menge Avenue; 2.  The county has issued bonds under Section 21-45-9 to finance all or a portion of a redevelopment project in the redevelopment project area; 3.  Any debt service for the indebtedness incurred is outstanding; and 4.  A development with a value of Ten Million Dollars ($10,000,000.00) or more is, or will be, located in the redevelopment area. (ii)  For a county that is eligible to receive funds under this paragraph (d), as determined by the department under this paragraph (d), from and after September 15, 2025, and each succeeding month thereafter, eighteen and one-half percent (18.5%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under this chapter, except that collected under Sections 27-65-15, 27-65-17(1)(n), 27-65-19(3) and 27-65-21, on business activities within a redevelopment project area developed under a redevelopment plan adopted under the Tax Increment Financing Act (Section 21-45-1 et seq.) shall be allocated for distribution to the county in which the project is located, and twenty-five and nine-tenths percent (25.9%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under Section 27-65-17(1)(n) shall be allocated for distribution to that county. (iii)  Before any sales tax revenue may be allocated for distribution to a county under this paragraph (d), the county shall certify to the Department of Revenue that the requirements of this paragraph (d) have been met, the amount of bonded indebtedness that has been incurred by the county for the redevelopment project and the expected date the indebtedness incurred by the county will be satisfied. (iv)  The diversion of sales tax revenue authorized by this paragraph (d) shall begin the month following the month in which the Department of Revenue determines that the requirements of this paragraph (d) have been met.  The diversion shall end the month the indebtedness incurred by the county is satisfied.  All revenue received by the county under this paragraph (d) shall be deposited in the fund required to be created in the tax increment financing plan under Section 21-45-11 and be utilized solely to satisfy the indebtedness incurred by the county. (2)  On or before September 15, 1987, and each succeeding month thereafter, from the revenue collected under this chapter during the preceding month, One Million One Hundred Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($1,125,000.00) shall be allocated for distribution to municipal corporations as defined under subsection (1) of this section in the proportion that the number of gallons of gasoline and diesel fuel sold by distributors to consumers and retailers in each such municipality during the preceding fiscal year bears to the total gallons of gasoline and diesel fuel sold by distributors to consumers and retailers in municipalities statewide during the preceding fiscal year.  The Department of Revenue shall require all distributors of gasoline and diesel fuel to report to the department monthly the total number of gallons of gasoline and diesel fuel sold by them to consumers and retailers in each municipality during the preceding month.  The Department of Revenue shall have the authority to promulgate such rules and regulations as is necessary to determine the number of gallons of gasoline and diesel fuel sold by distributors to consumers and retailers in each municipality.  In determining the percentage allocation of funds under this subsection for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 1987, and ending June 30, 1988, the Department of Revenue may consider gallons of gasoline and diesel fuel sold for a period of less than one (1) fiscal year.  For the purposes of this subsection, the term "fiscal year" means the fiscal year beginning July 1 of a year. (3)  On or before September 15, 1987, and on or before the fifteenth day of each succeeding month, until the date specified in Section 65-39-35, the proceeds derived from contractors' taxes levied under Section 27-65-21 on contracts for the construction or reconstruction of highways designated under the highway program created under Section 65-3-97 shall, except as otherwise provided in Section 31-17-127, be deposited into the State Treasury to the credit of the State Highway Fund to be used to fund that highway program.  The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall provide to the Department of Revenue such information as is necessary to determine the amount of proceeds to be distributed under this subsection. (4)  On or before August 15, 1994, and on or before the fifteenth day of each succeeding month through July 15, 1999, from the proceeds of gasoline, diesel fuel or kerosene taxes as provided in Section 27-5-101(a)(ii)1, Four Million Dollars ($4,000,000.00) shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of a special fund designated as the "State Aid Road Fund," created by Section 65-9-17. On or before August 15, 1999, and on or before the fifteenth day of each succeeding month through August 15, 2026, from the total amount of the proceeds of gasoline, diesel fuel or kerosene taxes apportioned by Section 27-5-101(a)(ii)1, Four Million Dollars ($4,000,000.00) or an amount equal to twenty-three and one-fourth percent (23-1/4%) of those funds, whichever is the greater amount, shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the "State Aid Road Fund," created by Section 65-9-17.  After August 15, 2025, from the total amount of the proceeds of gasoline, diesel fuel or kerosene taxes apportioned by Section 27-5-101(a)(ii)1 and (iii), Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00) or an amount equal to twenty-three and one-fourth percent (23-1/4%) of those funds, whichever is greater, shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the "State Aid Road Fund" on or before September 15, 2025, and on or before the fifteenth day of each succeeding month through August 15, 2026, and Six Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($6,500,000.00) or an amount equal to twenty-three and one-fourth percent (23-1/4%) of those funds, whichever is greater, shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the "State Aid Road Fund" on or before September 15, 2026, and on or before the fifteenth day of each succeeding month through August 15, 2027, and Eight Million Dollars ($8,000,000.00) or an amount equal to twenty-three and one-fourth percent (23-1/4%) of those funds, whichever is greater, shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the "State Aid Road Fund" on or before September 15, 2027, and on or before the fifteenth day of each succeeding month.  From the amount of taxes paid into the special fund under this subsection and subsection (9) of this section, there shall be first deducted and paid the amount necessary to pay the expenses of the Office of State Aid Road Construction, as authorized by the Legislature for all other general and special fund agencies.  The remainder of the funds shall be allocated monthly to the several counties in accordance with the following formula: (a)  One-third (1/3) shall be allocated to all counties in equal shares; (b)  One-third (1/3) shall be allocated to counties based on the proportion that the total number of rural road miles in a county bears to the total number of rural road miles in all counties of the state; and (c)  One-third (1/3) shall be allocated to counties based on the proportion that the rural population of the county bears to the total rural population in all counties of the state, according to the latest federal decennial census. For the purposes of this subsection, the term "gasoline, diesel fuel or kerosene taxes" means such taxes as defined in paragraph (f) of Section 27-5-101. The amount of funds allocated to any county under this subsection for any fiscal year after fiscal year 1994 shall not be less than the amount allocated to the county for fiscal year 1994. Any reference in the general laws of this state or the Mississippi Code of 1972 to Section 27-5-105 shall mean and be construed to refer and apply to subsection (4) of Section 27-65-75. (5)  On or before August 15, 2024, and each succeeding month thereafter, One Million Six Hundred Sixty-six Thousand Six Hundred Sixty-six Dollars ($1,666,666.00) shall be paid into the special fund known as the Education Enhancement Fund created and existing under the provisions of Section 37-61-33. (6)  An amount each month beginning August 15, 1983, through November 15, 1986, as specified in Section 6, Chapter 542, Laws of 1983, shall be paid into the special fund known as the Correctional Facilities Construction Fund created in Section 6, Chapter 542, Laws of 1983. (7)  On or before August 15, 1992, and each succeeding month thereafter through July 15, 2000, two and two hundred sixty-six one-thousandths percent (2.266%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter, except that collected under the provisions of Section 27-65-17(2), shall be deposited by the department into the School Ad Valorem Tax Reduction Fund created under Section 37-61-35.  On or before August 15, 2000, and each succeeding month thereafter through August 15, 2025, two and two hundred sixty-six one-thousandths percent (2.266%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter, except that collected under the provisions of Section 27-65-17(2), shall be deposited into the School Ad Valorem Tax Reduction Fund created under Section 37-61-35 until such time that the total amount deposited into the fund during a fiscal year equals Forty-two Million Dollars ($42,000,000.00).  Thereafter, the amounts diverted under this subsection (7) during the fiscal year in excess of Forty-two Million Dollars ($42,000,000.00) shall be deposited into the Education Enhancement Fund created under Section 37-61-33 for appropriation by the Legislature as other education needs and shall not be subject to the percentage appropriation requirements set forth in Section 37-61-33.  On or before September 15, 2025, and each succeeding month thereafter, two and two hundred sixty-six one-thousandths percent (2.266%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under this chapter, except that collected under Section 27-65-17(1)(n) and (2), and three and seventeen one-hundredths percent (3.17%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under Section 27-65-17(1)(n), shall be deposited into the School Ad Valorem Tax Reduction Fund created under Section 37-61-35 until such time that the total amount deposited into the fund during a fiscal year equals Forty-two Million Dollars ($42,000,000.00).  Thereafter, the amounts diverted under this subsection (7) during the fiscal year in excess of Forty-two Million Dollars ($42,000,000.00) shall be deposited into the Education Enhancement Fund created under Section 37-61-33 for appropriation by the Legislature as other education needs and shall not be subject to the percentage appropriation requirements set forth in Section 37-61-33. (8)  On or before August 15, 1992, and each succeeding month thereafter through August 15, 2025, nine and seventy-three one-thousandths percent (9.073%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter, except that collected under the provisions of Section 27-65-17(2), shall be deposited into the Education Enhancement Fund created under Section 37-61-33.  On or before September 15, 2025, and each succeeding month thereafter, nine and seventy-three one-thousandths percent (9.073%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under this chapter, except that collected under Section 27-65-17(1)(n) and (2), and twelve and seven-tenths percent (12.7%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under Section 27-65-17(1)(n), shall be deposited into the Education Enhancement Fund created under Section 37-61-33. (9)  On or before August 15, 1994, and each succeeding month thereafter, from the revenue collected under this chapter during the preceding month, Two Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($250,000.00) shall be paid into the State Aid Road Fund. (10)  On or before August 15, 1994, and each succeeding month thereafter through August 15, 1995, from the revenue collected under this chapter during the preceding month, Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00) shall be deposited into the Motor Vehicle Ad Valorem Tax Reduction Fund established in Section 27-51-105. (11)  Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary, on or before February 15, 1995, and each succeeding month thereafter, the sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of Section 27-65-17(2) and the corresponding levy in Section 27-65-23 on the rental or lease of private carriers of passengers and light carriers of property as defined in Section 27-51-101 shall be deposited, without diversion, into the Motor Vehicle Ad Valorem Tax Reduction Fund established in Section 27-51-105. (12)  Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary, on or before August 15, 1995, and each succeeding month thereafter, the sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of Section 27-65-17(1) on retail sales of private carriers of passengers and light carriers of property, as defined in Section 27-51-101 and the corresponding levy in Section 27-65-23 on the rental or lease of these vehicles, shall be deposited, after diversion, into the Motor Vehicle Ad Valorem Tax Reduction Fund established in Section 27-51-105. (13)  On or before July 15, 1994, and on or before the fifteenth day of each succeeding month thereafter, that portion of the avails of the tax imposed in Section 27-65-22 that is derived from activities held on the Mississippi State Fairgrounds Complex shall be paid into a special fund that is created in the State Treasury and shall be expended upon legislative appropriation solely to defray the costs of repairs and renovation at the Trade Mart and Coliseum. (14)  On or before August 15, 1998, and each succeeding month thereafter through July 15, 2005, that portion of the avails of the tax imposed in Section 27-65-23 that is derived from sales by cotton compresses or cotton warehouses and that would otherwise be paid into the General Fund shall be deposited in an amount not to exceed Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00) into the special fund created under Section 69-37-39. On or before August 15, 2007, and each succeeding month thereafter through July 15, 2010, that portion of the avails of the tax imposed in Section 27-65-23 that is derived from sales by cotton compresses or cotton warehouses and that would otherwise be paid into the General Fund shall be deposited in an amount not to exceed Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00) into the special fund created under Section 69-37-39 until all debts or other obligations incurred by the Certified Cotton Growers Organization under the Mississippi Boll Weevil Management Act before January 1, 2007, are satisfied in full.  On or before August 15, 2010, and each succeeding month thereafter through July 15, 2011, fifty percent (50%) of that portion of the avails of the tax imposed in Section 27-65-23 that is derived from sales by cotton compresses or cotton warehouses and that would otherwise be paid into the General Fund shall be deposited into the special fund created under Section 69-37-39 until such time that the total amount deposited into the fund during a fiscal year equals One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00).  On or before August 15, 2011, and each succeeding month thereafter, that portion of the avails of the tax imposed in Section 27-65-23 that is derived from sales by cotton compresses or cotton warehouses and that would otherwise be paid into the General Fund shall be deposited into the special fund created under Section 69-37-39 until such time that the total amount deposited into the fund during a fiscal year equals One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00). (15)  Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary, on or before September 15, 2000, and each succeeding month thereafter, the sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of Section 27-65-19(1)(d)(i)2, and 27-65-19(1)(d)(i)3 shall be deposited, without diversion, into the Telecommunications Ad Valorem Tax Reduction Fund established in Section 27-38-7. (16)  (a)  On or before August 15, 2000, and each succeeding month thereafter, the sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter on the gross proceeds of sales of a project as defined in Section 57-30-1 shall be deposited, after all diversions except the diversion provided for in subsection (1) of this section, into the Sales Tax Incentive Fund created in Section 57-30-3. (b)  On or before August 15, 2007, and each succeeding month thereafter, eighty percent (80%) of the sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter from the operation of a tourism project under the provisions of Sections 57-26-1 through 57-26-5, shall be deposited, after the diversions required in subsections (7) and (8) of this section, into the Tourism Project Sales Tax Incentive Fund created in Section 57-26-3. (17)  Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary, on or before April 15, 2002, and each succeeding month thereafter, the sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under Section 27-65-23 on sales of parking services of parking garages and lots at airports shall be deposited, without diversion, into the special fund created under Section 27-5-101(d). (18)  [Repealed] (19)  (a)  On or before August 15, 2005, and each succeeding month thereafter, the sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter on the gross proceeds of sales of a business enterprise located within a redevelopment project area under the provisions of Sections 57-91-1 through 57-91-11, and the revenue collected on the gross proceeds of sales from sales made to a business enterprise located in a redevelopment project area under the provisions of Sections 57-91-1 through 57-91-11 (provided that such sales made to a business enterprise are made on the premises of the business enterprise), shall, except as otherwise provided in this subsection (19), be deposited, after all diversions, into the Redevelopment Project Incentive Fund as created in Section 57-91-9. (b)  For a municipality participating in the Economic Redevelopment Act created in Sections 57-91-1 through 57-91-11, the diversion provided for in subsection (1) of this section attributable to the gross proceeds of sales of a business enterprise located within a redevelopment project area under the provisions of Sections 57-91-1 through 57-91-11, and attributable to the gross proceeds of sales from sales made to a business enterprise located in a redevelopment project area under the provisions of Sections 57-91-1 through 57-91-11 (provided that such sales made to a business enterprise are made on the premises of the business enterprise), shall be deposited into the Redevelopment Project Incentive Fund as created in Section 57-91-9, as follows: (i)  For the first six (6) years in which payments are made to a developer from the Redevelopment Project Incentive Fund, one hundred percent (100%) of the diversion shall be deposited into the fund; (ii)  For the seventh year in which such payments are made to a developer from the Redevelopment Project Incentive Fund, eighty percent (80%) of the diversion shall be deposited into the fund; (iii)  For the eighth year in which such payments are made to a developer from the Redevelopment Project Incentive Fund, seventy percent (70%) of the diversion shall be deposited into the fund; (iv)  For the ninth year in which such payments are made to a developer from the Redevelopment Project Incentive Fund, sixty percent (60%) of the diversion shall be deposited into the fund; and (v)  For the tenth year in which such payments are made to a developer from the Redevelopment Project Incentive Fund, fifty percent (50%) of the funds shall be deposited into the fund. (20)  On or before January 15, 2007, and each succeeding month thereafter, eighty percent (80%) of the sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter from the operation of a tourism project under the provisions of Sections 57-28-1 through 57-28-5 shall be deposited, after the diversions required in subsections (7) and (8) of this section, into the Tourism Sales Tax Incentive Fund created in Section 57-28-3. (21)  (a)  On or before April 15, 2007, and each succeeding month thereafter through June 15, 2013, One Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($150,000.00) of the sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter shall be deposited into the MMEIA Tax Incentive Fund created in Section 57-101-3. (b)  On or before July 15, 2013, and each succeeding month thereafter, One Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($150,000.00) of the sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter shall be deposited into the Mississippi Development Authority Job Training Grant Fund created in Section 57-1-451. (22)  On or before June 1, 2024, and each succeeding month thereafter until December 31, 2057, an amount determined annually by the Mississippi Development Authority of the sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter shall be deposited into the MMEIA Tax Incentive Fund created in Section 57-125-3.  This amount shall be based on estimated payments due within the upcoming year to construction contractors pursuant to construction contracts subject to the tax imposed by Section 27-65-21 for construction to be performed on the project site of a project defined under Section 57-75-5(f)(xxxiii) for the coming year. (23)  Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary, on or before August 15, 2009, and each succeeding month thereafter, the sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of Section 27-65-201 shall be deposited, without diversion, into the Motor Vehicle Ad Valorem Tax Reduction Fund established in Section 27-51-105. (24)  (a)  On or before August 15, 2019, and each month thereafter through July 15, 2020, one percent (1%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month from restaurants and hotels shall be allocated for distribution to the Mississippi Development Authority Tourism Advertising Fund established under Section 57-1-64, to be used exclusively for the purpose stated therein.  On or before August 15, 2020, and each month thereafter through July 15, 2021, two percent (2%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month from restaurants and hotels shall be allocated for distribution to the Mississippi Development Authority Tourism Advertising Fund established under Section 57-1-64, to be used exclusively for the purpose stated therein.  On or before August 15, 2021, and each month thereafter, three percent (3%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month from restaurants and hotels shall be allocated for distribution to the Mississippi Development Authority Tourism Advertising Fund established under Section 57-1-64, to be used exclusively for the purpose stated therein.  The revenue diverted pursuant to this subsection shall not be available for expenditure until February 1, 2020. (b)  The Joint Legislative Committee on Performance Evaluation and Expenditure Review (PEER) must provide an annual report to the Legislature indicating the amount of funds deposited into the Mississippi Development Authority Tourism Advertising Fund established under Section 57-1-64, and a detailed record of how the funds are spent. (25)  (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary, on or before September 15, 2025, and each succeeding month thereafter, the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of Sections 27-65-17(1)(o) and 27-65-25 from the amount of the increases to tax rates under such sections as provided in this act shall be deposited, without diversion, into the Mississippi Hospitals Uncompensated Care Assistance Fund created in Section 11 of this act. (b)  The provisions of this subsection (25) shall supersede and control over any other provisions of this section providing for the distribution of revenue under this section. ( * * *2526)  The remainder of the amounts collected under the provisions of this chapter shall be paid into the State Treasury to the credit of the General Fund. ( * * *2627)  (a)  It shall be the duty of the municipal officials of any municipality that expands its limits, or of any community that incorporates as a municipality, to notify the commissioner of that action thirty (30) days before the effective date.  Failure to so notify the commissioner shall cause the municipality to forfeit the revenue that it would have been entitled to receive during this period of time when the commissioner had no knowledge of the action. (b)  (i)  Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, if any funds have been erroneously disbursed to any municipality or any overpayment of tax is recovered by the taxpayer, the commissioner may make correction and adjust the error or overpayment with the municipality by withholding the necessary funds from any later payment to be made to the municipality. (ii)  Subject to the provisions of Sections 27-65-51 and 27-65-53, if any funds have been erroneously disbursed to a municipality under subsection (1) of this section for a period of three (3) years or more, the maximum amount that may be recovered or withheld from the municipality is the total amount of funds erroneously disbursed for a period of three (3) years beginning with the date of the first erroneous disbursement.  However, if during such period, a municipality provides written notice to the Department of Revenue indicating the erroneous disbursement of funds, then the maximum amount that may be recovered or withheld from the municipality is the total amount of funds erroneously disbursed for a period of one (1) year beginning with the date of the first erroneous disbursement. SECTION 4.  Section 27-69-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-69-3.  When used in this chapter: (a)  "State" means the State of Mississippi as geographically defined, and any and all waters under the jurisdiction of the State of Mississippi. (b)  "State Auditor" means the Auditor of Public Accounts of the State of Mississippi, or his legally appointed deputy, clerk or agent. (c) "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Revenue of the Department of Revenue, and his authorized agents and employees. (d)  "Person" means any individual, company, corporation, partnership, association, joint venture, estate, trust, or any other group, or combination acting as a unit, and the plural as well as the singular, unless the intention to give a more limited meaning is disclosed by the context. (e)  "Consumer" means a person who comes into possession of tobacco for the purpose of consuming it, giving it away, or disposing of it in any way by sale, barter or exchange. (f)  "Tobacco" means any cigarettes, cigars, cheroots, stogies, smoking tobacco (including granulated, plug cut, crimp cut, ready rubbed, and other kinds and forms of tobacco, or substitutes therefor, prepared in such manner as to be suitable for smoking in a pipe or cigarette) and including plug and twist chewing tobacco and snuff, when such "tobacco" is manufactured and prepared for sale or personal consumption.  All words used herein, except vapor products, shall be given the meaning as defined in the regulations of the Treasury Department of the United States of America.  The term "tobacco" also includes heated tobacco products.  The term "tobacco" also includes vapor products. (g)  "First sale" means and includes the first sale, or distribution of such tobacco in intrastate commerce, or the first use or consumption of such tobacco within this state. (h) "Drop shipment" means and includes any delivery of tobacco received by any person within this state, when payment for such tobacco is made to the shipper, or seller by or through a person other than a consignee. (i)  "Distributor" includes every person, except retailers as defined herein, in the state who manufactures or produces tobacco or who ships, transports, or imports into this state, or in any manner acquires or possesses tobacco, and makes a first sale of the same in the state. (j)  "Wholesaler" includes dealers, whose principal business is that of a wholesale dealer or jobber, who is known to the retail trade as such, and whose place of business is located in Mississippi or in a state which affords reciprocity to wholesalers domiciled in Mississippi, who shall sell any taxable tobacco to retail dealers only for the purpose of resale. (k)  "Retailer" includes every person, other than a wholesale dealer, as defined above, whose principal business is that of selling merchandise at retail, who shall sell, or offer for sale tobacco to the consumer.  The sale of tobacco in quantity lots by retailers to other retailers, transient vendors, or other persons, shall not be construed as wholesale and shall not qualify such retailer for a permit as a wholesaler. (l)  "Dealer" includes every person, firm, corporation or association of persons, except retailers as defined herein, who manufacture tobacco for distribution, for sale, for use or for consumption in the State of Mississippi. The word "dealer" is further defined to mean any person, firm, corporation or association of persons, except retailers as defined herein, who imports tobacco from any state or foreign country for distribution, sale, use, or consumption in the State of Mississippi. (m)  "Distributing agent" includes every person in the state who acts as an agent of any person outside the State of Mississippi, by receiving tobacco in interstate commerce, and storing such tobacco in this state subject to distribution, or delivery upon order from the person outside the state to distributors, wholesalers, retailers and dealers. (n)  "Transient vendor" means and includes every person commonly and generally termed "peddlers" and every person acting for himself, or as an agent, employee, salesman, or in any capacity for another, whether as owner, bailee, or other custodian of tobacco, and going from person to person, dealer to dealer, house to house, or place to place, and selling or offering for sale at retail or wholesale tobacco, and every person who does not keep a regular place of business open at all times in regular hours, and every person who goes from person to person, dealer to dealer, house to house, or place to place, and sells or offers for sale tobacco which he carries with him, and who delivers the same at the time of, or immediately after the sale, or without returning to the place of business operations (a permanent place of business within the state) between the taking of the order and the delivery of the tobacco, or All persons who go from person to person, house to house, place to place, or dealer to dealer, soliciting orders by exhibiting samples, or taking orders, and thereafter making delivery of tobacco, or filling the order without carrying or sending the order to the permanent place of business, and thereafter making delivery of the tobacco pursuant to the terms of the order, or All persons who go from person to person, place to place, house to house, or dealer to dealer, carrying samples and selling tobacco from samples, and afterwards making delivery without taking and sending an order therefor to a permanent place of business for the filling of the order, and delivery of the tobacco, or the exchange of tobacco having become damaged or unsalable, or the purchase by tobacco of advertising space, or All persons who have in their possession, or under their control, any tobacco offered, or to be offered for sale or to be delivered, unless the sale or delivery thereof is to be made in pursuance of a bona fide order for the tobacco, to be sold or delivered, the order to be evidenced by an invoice or memorandum. (o)  "Contraband tobacco" means all tobacco found in the possession of any person whose permit to engage in dealing in tobacco has been revoked by the commissioner; and any cigarettes found in the possession of any person to which the proper tax stamps have not been affixed; and any cigarettes improperly stamped when found in the possession of any person; and all other tobacco upon which the excise tax has not been paid. (p)  "Sale" means an exchange for money or goods, giving away, or distributing any tobacco as defined in this chapter. (q)  "Forty-eight (48) hours" and "seventy-two (72) hours" means two (2) calendar days and three (3) calendar days, respectively, excluding Sundays and legal holidays. (r)  "Stamp" or "stamping," or the import of such word, when used in this chapter, means any manner of stamp or impression permitted by the commissioner that carries out the purposes of the chapter in clearly indicating upon the packages of cigarettes taxed the due payment of the tax and clearly identifying, by serial number or otherwise, the permittee who affixed the stamp to the particular package. (s) "Manufacturer's list price" means the full sales price at which tobacco is sold or offered for sale by a manufacturer to the wholesaler or distributor in this state without any deduction for freight, trade discount, cash discounts, special discounts or deals, cash rebates, or any other reduction from the regular selling price.  In the event freight charges on shipments to wholesalers or distributors are not paid by the manufacturer, then such freight charges required to be paid by the wholesalers and distributors shall be added to the amount paid to the manufacturer in order to determine "manufacturer's list price."  In the case of a wholesaler or distributor whose place of business is located outside this state, the "manufacturer's list price" for tobacco sold in this state by such wholesaler or distributor shall in all cases be considered to be the same as that of a wholesaler or distributor located within this state. (t)  "Heated tobacco products" means a product containing tobacco that produces an inhalable aerosol by (i) heating the tobacco without combustion of the tobacco or (ii) heat generated from a combustion source that only or primarily heats rather than burns the tobacco. (u)  "Vapor product" means an electronic product or device that may be used to deliver any aerosolized or vaporized substance to the person inhaling from the product or device, including, but not limited to, an e-cigar, e-cigarillo, e-pipe, vape pen or e-hookah; and includes any cartridge, component, part or accessory of the electronic product or device, whether or not sold separately, and also includes any liquid, capsule, powder or substance intended to be aerosolized, vaporized or otherwise ingested during the use of the electronic product or device, whether or not the substance contains nicotine.  The term "vapor product" does not include (i) a product that is a drug under 21 USCS 321(g)(1); (ii) a product that is a device under 21 USCS 321(h); or (iii) a combination product described in 21 USCS 353(g). SECTION 5.  Section 27-69-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-69-13.  There is hereby imposed, levied and assessed, to be collected and paid as hereinafter provided in this chapter, an excise tax on each person or dealer in cigarettes, cigars, stogies, snuff, chewing tobacco, * * *and smoking tobacco, vapor products, or substitutes therefor, upon the sale, use, consumption, handling or distribution in the State of Mississippi, as follows: (a)  On cigarettes, the rate of tax shall be * * *Three and Four‑tenths Cents (3.4¢) Four and Four-tenths Cents (4.4¢) on each cigarette sold with a maximum length of one hundred twenty (120) millimeters; any cigarette in excess of this length shall be taxed as if it were two (2) or more cigarettes.  Provided, however, if the federal tax rate on cigarettes in effect on June 1, 1985, is reduced, then the rate as provided herein shall be increased by the amount of the federal tax reduction.  Such tax increase shall take effect on the first day of the month following the effective date of such reduction in the federal tax rate.  Heated tobacco products shall not be taxed as cigarettes under this paragraph (a); however, this exclusion shall not affect heated tobacco products for any purposes related to Section 27-70-1 et seq. (b)  On cigars, cheroots, stogies, snuff, chewing and smoking tobacco, vapor products and all other tobacco products except cigarettes and heated tobacco products, the rate of tax shall be * * *fifteen percent (15%) sixteen percent (16%) of the manufacturer's list price. (c)  On heated tobacco products, the rate of tax shall be one and twenty-five one-hundredths cents (1.25¢) on each disposable heated tobacco unit or stick sold to be used for consumption by insertion into a heated tobacco product heating system device. No stamp evidencing the tax herein levied on cigarettes shall be of a denomination of less than One Cent (1¢), and whenever the tax computed at the rates herein prescribed on cigarettes shall be a specified amount, plus a fractional part of One Cent (1¢), the package shall be stamped for the next full cent; however, the additional face value of stamps purchased to comply with taxes imposed by this section after June 1, 1985, shall be subject to a four percent (4%) discount or compensation to dealers for their services rather than the eight percent (8%) discount or compensation allowed by Section 27-69-31. Every wholesaler shall purchase stamps as provided in this chapter, and affix the same to all packages of cigarettes handled by him as herein provided. The above tax is levied upon the sale, use, gift, possession or consumption of tobacco within the State of Mississippi, and the impact of the tax levied by this chapter is hereby declared to be on the vendee, user, consumer or possessor of tobacco in this state; and when said tax is paid by any other person, such payment shall be considered as an advance payment and shall thereafter be added to the price of the tobacco and recovered from the ultimate consumer or user. SECTION 6.  Section 27-69-15, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-69-15.  Any retailer, transient vendor, distributing agent, salesman, or other dealer who shall receive any cigarettes other than from a wholesaler having a permit as herein provided, and not having the necessary stamps already affixed, shall, after the receipt of such cigarettes, within the time limit herein provided, present the same to some wholesaler having such permit, for the affixing of the stamps required, and it shall be the duty of such wholesaler, thereupon and upon the payment to him by such retailer of the face value of the stamps required, to affix the stamps to said cigarettes in the same manner as if the cigarettes were handled and sold by such wholesaler, provided, that such wholesaler, before affixing the stamps, shall require of the retailer, transient vendor, distributing agent, salesman, or other dealer, the original invoice for the cigarettes to be stamped, and such wholesaler shall in each instance note upon the invoice, the denominations and number of stamps affixed to the cigarettes covered by said invoice, the notation to be made in ink, or other manner not easy to erase, at the time the stamps are affixed. It is further provided that, in addition hereto, the wholesaler shall keep a separate record of all stamps affixed to taxable cigarettes presented by retailers, transient vendors, distributing agents, salesmen, or other dealers, showing the name of the retailer, transient vendor, distributing agent, salesman, or other dealer, name of the shipper, date of shipper's invoice, the date stamps were affixed, denomination of stamps affixed, and total value of stamps affixed. When the request is made to any wholesaler in this state by a retailer, transient vendor, distributing agent, salesman, or other dealer in this state, said request being duly and seasonably made for the affixing of stamps, and the request is accompanied by proper remittance and invoice, and such wholesaler refuses to affix the stamps to cigarettes as requested, said wholesaler shall forfeit to the state a penalty of Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) for each offense, the same to be collected by the commissioner and, in addition thereto, in the discretion of the commissioner, forfeit his permit to handle stamps.  In the event of such refusal on the part of any wholesaler to affix stamps said retailer, transient vendor, distributing agent, salesman, or other dealer may make application to the commissioner for stamps to be placed on the cigarettes upon which the wholesaler refused to affix the stamps, said application to be accompanied by an affidavit from the retailer, transient vendor, distributing agent, salesman, or other dealer, or some other credible person, setting forth the facts, whereupon the commissioner may issue and sell to such retailer, transient vendor, distributing agent, salesman, or other dealer, a sufficient number of stamps to be affixed to the cigarettes. Stamps shall not be affixed to any cigarettes except by a wholesale dealer having a permit, except as otherwise provided in this chapter. Stamps shall not be required to be affixed to any cigarettes while the same is in interstate commerce. Any person engaged in this state in the business of making wholesale or retail sales of other tobacco products including cigars, smoking tobacco, chewing tobacco, snuff, vapor products or any other tobacco products except cigarettes and heated tobacco products who purchases such products from a wholesaler or manufacturer outside this state upon which the Mississippi tobacco excise tax has not been imposed, shall be responsible for remitting the Mississippi tobacco excise tax directly to the Mississippi Department of Revenue by the twentieth of the month following the month the sale occurred of the other tobacco products by such person to a Mississippi customer. Any person making retail purchases of other tobacco products including cigars, smoking tobacco, chewing tobacco, snuff, vapor products or any other tobacco products except cigarettes and heated tobacco products for personal use in this state who purchased such other tobacco products from outside this state upon which the Mississippi tobacco excise tax has not been imposed, shall be responsible for remitting the Mississippi tobacco excise tax directly to the Mississippi Department of Revenue within forty-eight (48) hours after the purchase of the other tobacco products. In no case shall the provisions of this chapter be construed to require the payment of a tax upon any tobacco upon which the tax herein levied has once been paid to the state. SECTION 7.  Section 27-69-27, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-69-27.  The payment of the tax imposed by this chapter shall be evidenced by affixing stamps to each individual package of cigarettes usually sold to consumers, as distinguished from cartons or larger units which are composed of a number of individual packages. Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, the stamp shall be affixed within seventy-two (72) hours after the receipt of the cigarettes by the wholesaler, and within forty-eight (48) hours after receipt of the cigarettes by the retailer; provided, that in the case a dealer conducts a wholesale and retail business at one (1) place of business, stamps shall be affixed within forty-eight (48) hours after receipt of the cigarettes.  However, the provisions of this paragraph shall not apply to tobacco at the point it is purchased at a sale under Section 27-69-56.  The stamp must be so securely affixed as to require the continued application of water or of steam to remove it, or so that it cannot be otherwise removed without destruction or mutilation. The excise tax imposed on cigars, smoking tobacco, chewing tobacco, snuff, vapor products and all other tobacco products except cigarettes and heated tobacco products shall be computed by the application of the excise tax rate to the manufacturer's list price on all purchases of such tobacco.  The excise tax shall be due and payable on or before the fifteenth day of the month next succeeding the month in which the tax accrues.  The tax shall be filed with the commissioner on forms prescribed by the commissioner. Provided, however, manufacturers or other wholesale distributors of tobacco, which are subject to the excise taxes imposed by Section 27-69-13 of this chapter for the privilege of selling or using such tobaccos within this state, who maintain "terminals" or warehouses in which such tobaccos are stored, and who sell only to licensed wholesale dealers within the state who are qualified to purchase and affix the stamps required, may maintain such "spot stocks," intended only for such sales, without affixing the stamps or filing returns and paying the tax. Any person desiring to maintain such "terminal" or warehouse, shall make application to the commissioner and obtain a permit to maintain such stocks without affixing stamps thereto, for sale exclusively to out-of-state purchasers, or licensed wholesale dealers within this state, and the commissioner is hereby authorized to grant such permit upon the execution and filing with the commissioner, by the applicant, a bond with surety companies, authorized to do business in Mississippi, as surety thereon, and conditioned for the strict compliance by the applicant, with the following conditions under which said privilege may be granted. The person maintaining such stock of untaxed tobacco shall supply to the commissioner monthly, or at such times as the commissioner may require, complete invoices of all tobaccos received, and shall also supply correct invoices of all tobaccos removed from such "terminal" or warehouse, said invoices to contain the correct name and address of all persons to whom such tobacco shall be delivered or consigned, whether within or without the State of Mississippi. The penalty of such bond shall be determined by the commissioner, in an amount sufficient to protect the State of Mississippi from any loss of revenue which might occur by reason of the failure of principal to strictly adhere to the requirement that no tobacco would be sold from such stock within the State of Mississippi, except to licensed wholesale dealers. SECTION 8.  Section 27-69-33, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-69-33.  Manufacturers, distributors and wholesalers of cigars, cigarettes * * *or, smoking tobacco or vapor products subject to the tax under this chapter, doing both intrastate and interstate business in such tobacco, must qualify as interstate dealers in such tobacco by applying to the commissioner for permission to engage in such business, and, upon receipt of such permission, he shall be permitted to set aside such part of his stock as may be absolutely necessary for the conduct of such interstate business, without affixing the stamps to cigarettes required by this chapter. Said interstate stock shall be kept in an entirely separate part of the building, separate and apart from intrastate stock, and the said interstate business shall be conducted by the said wholesale dealer in accordance with rules and regulations to be promulgated by the commissioner. It is further provided that shipment of such merchandise be made only by a railroad, express company, boat line, or motor freight line certified by the Mississippi Public Service Commission as a common carrier, or by registered or insured parcel post. It is further provided that any manufacturer, distributor, or wholesaler of cigars, cigarettes * * *or, smoking tobacco or vapor products, engaged in interstate commerce in such tobaccos, shall report to the commissioner on or before the fifteenth day of each month, on forms prescribed by the commissioner, all sales of cigarettes made in interstate commerce during the preceding month to which Mississippi stamps were not affixed.  These reports must be made supplementary to the reports required to be filed by Section 27-69-35 of this chapter. Each shipment must be covered by a complete copy of invoice of the consignor, and supported by properly receipted bill of lading of the transportation company, or post office department as specified in the foregoing, and the receipted bills of lading and invoices shall be subject to inspection by the commissioner for a period of three (3) years. The commissioner is further authorized to verify the actual delivery to the consignee of such unstamped taxable cigarettes before allowing credit, and for the purpose of such verification, the commissioner may exchange information with the proper authorities of other states as to movement of taxable tobacco to and from other states into and from the State of Mississippi. SECTION 9.  Section 27-69-35, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-69-35.  It shall be the duty of every person subject to the provisions of this chapter, to keep an accurate set of records, showing all transactions had with reference to the purchase, sale or gift of cigars, cigarettes, * * *or, smoking tobacco or vapor products, and such person shall keep separately all invoices of cigars, cigarettes * * *or, smoking tobacco or vapor products, and shall keep a record of all stamps purchased, and such records, and all stocks of cigars, cigarettes * * *or, smoking tobacco or vapor products on hand, shall be open to inspection at all reasonable times to the commissioner; provided, however, that all retail dealers, transient vendors, distributing agents, or other dealers purchasing, or receiving cigars, cigarettes, * * *or, smoking tobacco or vapor products from without the state, whether the same shall have been ordered through a wholesaler, or jobber in this state, or by drop shipment, or otherwise, shall within five (5) days after receipt of the same, mail a duplicate invoice of all such purchases, or receipts, to the commissioner, and failure to furnish such duplicate invoices shall be deemed a misdemeanor. It is further provided that all manufacturers, distributors and wholesalers of cigars, cigarettes * * *or, smoking tobacco or vapor products, who have a permit required by this chapter shall furnish the commissioner with a statement monthly, showing the amount of taxable tobacco received, and must also furnish the commissioner with duplicate invoices covering stamps affixed to drop shipments purchased by retailers. In the examination of such books, records, etc., the commissioner shall have the power to administer oaths to any person, and any person answering falsely, under oath, any of such questions, shall be guilty of perjury. If any person being so examined, fails to answer questions propounded to him by the commissioner, or if any person, being summoned to appear and answer such questions, shall fail or refuse to do so, or if any person shall fail or refuse to permit the inspection of his stock of merchandise, or invoices, or books, or papers pertaining to any dealers in cigars, cigarettes * * *or, smoking tobacco or vapor products, the commissioner may make such fact known to the circuit court of the county in which such failure or refusal occurs, or judge thereof in termtime or in vacation, by petition, and such circuit court, or judge thereof, shall issue a summons for such person so refusing, returnable on a date to be fixed by said court, or said judge, and on said date, the said circuit court, or the circuit judge, shall proceed to examine into the truth of the matter set out in said petition, and if the same be found to be true, the said circuit court, or circuit judge, shall issue a writ of subpoena duces tecum ordering and directing the person so summoned to bring into court, and exhibit for the inspection of the commissioner, all such books, records, invoices, etc., as the court may deem proper from all the facts and circumstances in the case.  Any person failing or refusing to present such books, records, invoices, etc., or failing or refusing to testify, shall be punished for contempt as provided by Section 9-1-17 of the Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 10.  Section 27-69-75, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-69-75.  All taxes levied by this chapter shall be payable to the commissioner in cash, or by personal check, cashier's check, bank exchange, post office money order or express money order, and shall be deposited by the commissioner in the State Treasury on the same day collected.  No remittance other than cash shall be a final discharge of liability for the tax herein assessed and levied, unless and until it has been paid in cash to the commissioner. Except as otherwise provided in this section, all tobacco taxes collected, including tobacco license taxes, shall be deposited into the State Treasury to the credit of the General Fund.  On or before September 15, 2025, and each succeeding month thereafter tobacco taxes collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter from the increases to tax rates under Section 27-69-13 and as a result of the amendment to Section 27-69-3, as provided in this act shall be deposited into the Mississippi Hospital Uncompensated Care Assistance Fund created in Section 11 of this act. Wholesalers who are entitled to purchase stamps at a discount, as provided by Section 27-69-31, may have consigned to them, without advance payment, such stamps, if and when such wholesaler shall give to the commissioner a good and sufficient bond executed by some surety company authorized to do business in this state, conditioned to secure the payment for the stamps so consigned.  The commissioner shall require payment for such stamps not later than thirty (30) days from the date the stamps were consigned. SECTION 11. (1)  There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be designated as the "Mississippi Hospitals Uncompensated Care Assistance Fund", which shall consist of funds deposited therein under Sections 27-65-75(25) and 27-69-75, Mississippi Code of 1972, and funds from any other source designated for deposit into such fund.  The fund shall be maintained by the State Treasurer as a separate and special fund, separate and apart from the General Fund of the state.  Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any investment earnings or interest earned on amounts in the fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund.  Monies in the fund shall be used by the Department of Health, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the purposes described in subsection (2) of this section. (2)  (a)  The Department of Health shall establish a program for reimbursing hospitals, in whole or in part, for uncompensated medical care services as follows: (i)  Eighty percent (80%) of the monies in the fund shall be allocated to all hospitals in this state in equal shares, and (ii)  Twenty percent (20%) of the monies in the fund shall be allocated to hospitals in this state that have not more than seventy-five (75) licensed beds based on the proportion that the total uncompensated medical care services provided by such a hospital bears to the total uncompensated medical care services provided by all of such hospitals in the state, as determined by the Department of Health. (b)  A hospital desiring assistance under paragraph (a)(ii) of this subsection may apply to the Department of Health for reimbursement of the uncompensated medical care services.  A hospital desiring assistance must submit an application to the Department of Health.  The application must include a description of the medical care services provided by the hospital for which the assistance is requested, the total costs of the medical care services provided by the hospital and the portion of such costs for which the hospital was not compensated, the amount of assistance requested and any other information required by the Department of Health. (c)  The Department of Health shall have all powers necessary to implement and administer the program established under this section, and the department shall promulgate rules and regulations, in accordance with the Mississippi Administrative Procedures Law, necessary for the implementation of this section. SECTION 12.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.